Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202017-127
Public buildings; power to erect.

A city of the second class shall have the power to provide for the erection and government of any useful or necessary building for the use of the city.

Laws 1879, § 39, VIII, p. 201;

Laws 1881, c. 24, § 1, p. 195;

R.S.1913, § 5021;

C.S.1922, § 4190;

C.S.1929, § 17-129;

R.S.1943, § 17-127;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 22.